North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 2. Modernized hospital assessments.

§ 108A-146.1.
Public hospital assessment.

The public hospital assessment imposed under this Part shall apply to all public acute care hospitals.

The public hospital assessment shall be assessed as a percentage of each public acute care hospital’s hospital costs. The assessment percentage shall be calculated quarterly by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with this Part. The percentage for each quarter shall equal the aggregate assessment collection amount under

G.S. 108A-146.5

multiplied by the public hospital historical assessment share and divided by the total hospital costs for all public acute care hospitals holding a license on the first day of the assessment quarter.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.3.
Private hospital assessment.

The private hospital assessment imposed under this Part shall apply to all private acute care hospitals.

The private hospital assessment shall be assessed as a percentage of each private acute care hospital’s hospital costs. The assessment percentage shall be calculated quarterly by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with this Part. The percentage for each quarter shall equal the aggregate assessment collection amount under

G.S. 108A-146.5

multiplied by the private hospital historical assessment share and divided by the total hospital costs for all private acute care hospitals holding a license on the first day of the assessment quarter.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.5.
Aggregate assessment collection amount.

The aggregate assessment collection amount is an amount of money that is calculated by subtracting the intergovernmental transfer adjustment component under

G.S. 108A-146.13

from the sum of all of the following:

One-fourth of the State’s annual Medicaid payment.

The managed care component under

G.S. 108A-146.7

.

The fee-for-service component under

G.S. 108A-146.9

.

The GME component under

G.S. 108A-146.11

.

Beginning April 1, 2022, and ending March 31, 2027, the postpartum coverage component under

G.S. 108A-146.12

.

Beginning April 1, 2024, the home and community-based services component under

G.S. 108A-146.12

A.

History.

2021-61, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(i), made the rewriting of this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(b), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to modernized hospital assessments imposed under Part 2 of Article 7A of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(b), rewrote the section. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108A-146.7.
Managed care component.

The managed care component is an amount of money that is a portion of the total paid capitation for all rating groups in all capitated contracted plan types for the previous data collection period and is calculated in accordance with this section. The managed care component consists of an inpatient subcomponent and an outpatient subcomponent.

The inpatient subcomponent is an amount calculated for each rating group by multiplying the paid capitation for the applicable rating group in the previous data collection period by the percentage that is calculated by (i) multiplying the inpatient portion of the statewide capitation rate for the applicable rating group by the inpatient hospital financing percentage, (ii) multiplying that product by the difference of one minus the FMAP, and (iii) dividing that product by the statewide capitation rate for the applicable rating group.

The outpatient subcomponent is an amount calculated for each rating group by multiplying the paid capitation for the applicable rating group in the previous data collection period by the percentage that is calculated by (i) multiplying the outpatient portion of the statewide capitation rate for the applicable rating group by the outpatient hospital financing percentage, (ii) multiplying that product by the difference of one minus the FMAP, and (iii) dividing that product by the statewide capitation rate for the applicable rating group.

The managed care component is calculated by adding together the aggregate inpatient subcomponents for all rating groups and the aggregate outpatient subcomponents for all rating groups.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.9.
Fee-for-service component.

The fee-for-service component is an amount of money that is a portion of all the Medicaid fee-for-service payments made to acute care hospitals during the previous data collection period for claims with a date of service on or after July 1, 2021. The fee-for-service component consists of a subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is no third-party coverage and a subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is third-party coverage.

The subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is no third-party coverage is the sum of the inpatient amount and the outpatient amount described in this subsection:

The inpatient amount is the product of the total fee-for-service payments for claims for which there is no third-party coverage made to all acute care hospitals for inpatient hospital services multiplied by the inpatient hospital financing percentage and multiplied by the difference of one minus the FMAP.

The outpatient amount is the product of the total fee-for-service payments for claims for which there is no third-party coverage made to all acute care hospitals for outpatient hospital services multiplied by the outpatient hospital financing percentage and multiplied by the difference of one minus the FMAP.

The subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is third-party coverage is the product of the total fee-for-service payments for claims for which there is third-party coverage made for inpatient hospital services and outpatient hospital services to (i) public acute care hospitals, (ii) private acute care hospitals, and (iii) critical access hospitals multiplied by the difference of one minus the FMAP.

The fee-for-service component is calculated by adding together the subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is no third-party coverage and the subcomponent pertaining to claims for which there is third-party coverage.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.11.
Graduate medical education component.

The graduate medical education component is an amount of money that is one-fourth (1/4) of the total amount of payments that will be made by the Department during the current State fiscal year to all public acute care hospitals and private acute care hospitals in accordance with the Medicaid graduate medical education methodology in the Medicaid State Plan multiplied by the difference of one minus the FMAP.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.12.
Postpartum coverage component.

The postpartum coverage component is twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000) for each quarter of the 2021-2022 State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the postpartum coverage component shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by the Medicare Economic Index.

History.

2021-180, s. 9D.13A(c).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(f), provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to consult with stakeholders and the Division of Health Benefits of the Department of Health and Human Services prior to its 2022 Regular Session in order to consider any necessary refinements to the postpartum coverage subcomponent and the home and community-based services component of the modernized hospital assessments enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(i), made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(c ), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to modernized hospital assessments imposed under Part 2 of Article 7A of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(i), made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(c ), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to modernized hospital assessments imposed under Part 2 of Article 7A of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes on or after that date.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 108A-146.12A.
Home and community-based services component.

The home and community-based services component is thirty-five million five hundred thousand dollars ($35,500,000) for each quarter of the 2023-2024 State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the postpartum coverage component shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by the Medicare Economic Index.

History.

2021-180, s 9D.13A(c).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(e), (f), provides: “(e) Notwithstanding

G.S. 108A-146.12

A and G.S. 108A-146.13(3), for the assessment quarter that begins on April 1, 2024, the home and community-based services component is forty million three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($40,350,000) and the home and community-based services subcomponent is nine million five hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($9,563,000).

“(f) It is the intent of the General Assembly to consult with stakeholders and the Division of Health Benefits of the Department of Health and Human Services prior to its 2022 Regular Session in order to consider any necessary refinements to the postpartum coverage subcomponent and the home and community-based services component of the modernized hospital assessments enacted by this section.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(i), made this section, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(c ), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to modernized hospital assessments imposed under Part 2 of Article 7A of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 108A-146.13.
Intergovernmental transfer adjustment component.

The intergovernmental transfer adjustment component is the sum of all of the following subcomponents:

The historical subcomponent is forty-one million two hundred twenty-seven thousand three hundred twenty-one dollars ($41,227,321) for each quarter of the 2021-2022 State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the historical subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by the market basket percentage.

The postpartum subcomponent applies to the assessments under this Part only during the period of April 1, 2022, through March 31, 2027, and is two million nine hundred sixty-two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,962,500) for each quarter of the 2021-2022 State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the postpartum subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by the Medicare Economic Index.

The home and community-based services subcomponent applies to the assessments under this Part beginning April 1, 2024, and is eight million four hundred thirteen thousand five hundred dollars ($8,413,500) for each quarter of the 2023-2024 State fiscal year. For each subsequent State fiscal year, the home and community-based services subcomponent shall be increased over the prior year’s quarterly amount by the Medicare Economic Index.

If a public acute care hospital closes or becomes a private acute care hospital, then, beginning in the first assessment quarter following the closure or change to a private acute care hospital and for each quarter thereafter, the intergovernmental transfer adjustment component described in subsection (a) of this section, as inflated in accordance with that section, shall be reduced by the amount of the public acute care hospital’s intergovernmental transfer to the Department made during its last quarter of operation as a public acute care hospital.

History.

2021-61, s. 2; 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(i), made the rewriting of subsection (a) of this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(d), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to modernized hospital assessments imposed under Part 2 of Article 7A of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes on or after that date.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 9D.13A(e), provides: “Notwithstanding

G.S. 108A-146.12

A and G.S. 108A-146.13(3), for the assessment quarter that begins on April 1, 2024, the home and community-based services component is forty million three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($40,350,000) and the home and community-based services subcomponent is nine million five hundred sixty-three thousand dollars ($9,563,000).”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9D.13A(d), rewrote subsection (a). For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 108A-146.15.
Use of funds.

The proceeds of the assessments imposed under this Part, and all corresponding matching federal funds, must be used to make the State’s annual Medicaid payment to the State, to fund payments to hospitals made directly by the Department, to fund a portion of capitation payments to prepaid health plans attributable to hospital care, and to fund graduate medical education payments.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§ 108A-146.17.
Changes of hospital status.

For purposes of this section, hospital status includes all of the following:

A hospital’s status as a public acute care hospital, a private acute care hospital, or a hospital owned or controlled by the UNC Health Care system.

The operating status of an acute care hospital as open or closed, including new hospitals and hospital closures.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division whenever the Department is notified of a possible change of hospital status. The report shall be due 60 days after the Department is notified of the possible change. The report shall include all of the following:

The anticipated change of hospital status and the anticipated time frame during which the change of hospital status may occur.

Any proposed revisions to Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes that would be needed if the change in hospital status occurs, including proposed changes to the public and private hospital historical assessment shares in

G.S. 108A-145.3

and the intergovernmental transfer adjustment component in

G.S. 108A-146.13

, as well as the mathematical calculations supporting the proposed changes.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall report to the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division whenever the Department is notified that a change in hospital status has occurred. The report shall be due 60 days after the Department is notified of the change. The report shall include all of the following:

The change of hospital status and the date of the change.

Any proposed revisions to Article 7B of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes that are needed as a result of the change in hospital status, including proposed changes to the public and private hospital historical assessment shares in

G.S. 108A-145.3

and the intergovernmental transfer adjustment component in

G.S. 108A-146.13

, as well as the mathematical calculations supporting the proposed changes.

If the change of hospital status occurred because a public acute care hospital closed or became a private acute care hospital, then the amount of the public acute care hospital’s intergovernmental transfer to the Department made during its last quarter of operation.

History.

2021-61, s. 2.

§§ 108A-147 through 108A-149.

Reserved for future codification purposes.